Connecticut, session 2026, HB05098.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That additional funds be appropriated to the Department of
Transportation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for the purposes
of expanding the bus rapid transit system to include routes connecting
Hartford to Storrs with bus stations located, at a minimum, in East
Hartford, Manchester and Rockville.